Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SMALL BUSINESS ASSISTANCE PARTNERSHIPS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $6,425,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $6,425,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the small business assistance partnerships program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.682. All grant awards shall be for two consecutive years. Grants shall be awarded in the first year. The department may use up to five percent of the appropriation for administrative purposes. These are onetime appropriations. new text end